Illinois, session 104th, HB4665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-2-15 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-15)7    Sec. 3-2-15. Department of Corrections; report of hospice 8and palliative care for committed persons.9    (a) Purposes. The General Assembly finds that:10        (1) The United States prison population is aging 11    rapidly. 12        (2) Illinois' prison population is similarly aging 13    rapidly, with over 1,000 prisoners aged 65 or older. 14        (3) As a result of the aging prison population more 15    committed persons are in need of end-of-life care and 16    support services. 17        (4) The Department of Corrections has a policy on 18    end-of-life care, which provides, in part, that the goals 19    are: "safe, dignified and comfortable dying, 20    self-determined life closure and effective grieving". 21        (5) The Department of Corrections does not have a 22    formal hospice program; rather, end-of-life care is 23    provided on a prison-by-prison basis which results in   HB4665 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17713 RLC 31144 b1    inconsistent care for committed persons who have been 2    diagnosed with terminal illnesses or who are expected to 3    reach the end of their life. 4        (6) At some prisons, end-of-life care is at times 5    provided, in part, by other committed persons assigned as 6    aides. 7        (7) The Department of Corrections does not have 8    centralized or consistent data on the number of committed 9    persons receiving end-of-life care.10        (8) The Department of Corrections does not have 11    centralized or consistent data on the number of prisoner 12    aides who are assigned to assist in providing end-of-life 13    care. 14        (9) The Department of Corrections does not currently 15    have a system for tracking patient outcomes or grievances 16    related to the quality of end-of-life care provided. 17        (10) Data on the end-of-life care provided in the 18    Department of Corrections is needed to give the General 19    Assembly and the public an understanding of the 20    Department's approach to end-of-life care for terminally 21    ill committed persons in its custody. 22        (11) Eddie Thomas was a committed person of the 23    Department of Corrections who died alone in the back of a 24    prison infirmary without any end-of-life care just 5 25    months after being diagnosed with late stage lung cancer. 26    (b) Definitions. In this Section:   HB4665 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17713 RLC 31144 b1    "Advance directive for health care" means written 2instructions of the patient's wishes as to how future care 3should be delivered or declined, including decisions that must 4be made when the patient is not capable of expressing those 5wishes. Advance directives may also appoint an agent with 6power of attorney for health care. 7    "Department" means the Department of Corrections. 8    "Hospice and palliative care" means physical, social, 9emotional, and spiritual support care for committed persons 10who have been diagnosed with a known terminal condition with a 11life expectancy of 6 months or less. This includes, but is not 12limited to, assistance with activities of daily living and 13comfort care. 14    "Peer support" refers to assistance and companionship 15provided by committed persons who have been trained to offer 16emotional, social, and practical support to fellow committed 17persons receiving hospice and palliative care. 18    "Terminal condition" means an incurable or irreversible 19condition that, without the administration of life-sustaining 20procedures, will, according to reasonable medical judgment, 21result in death within a relatively short period of time; or a 22state of permanent unconsciousness from which, to a reasonable 23degree of medical certainty, there can be no recovery. 24    (c) Reporting requirement. No later than December 1 of 25each year, the Department shall prepare a report to be 26published on its website that contains, at a minimum, the   HB4665 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17713 RLC 31144 b1following information about hospice and palliative care in its 2institutions and facilities during the prior fiscal year:3        (1) demographic data of committed persons who received 4    hospice and palliative care, separated by the following 5    categories: 6            (A) race or ethnicity; 7            (B) gender; 8            (C) age; 9            (D) primary cause of terminal illness or 10        condition; and 11            (E) length of incarceration prior to receiving 12        end-of-life care; 13        (2) data on the number of committed persons in the 14    Department's hospice and palliative care programs, 15    including the following: 16            (A) the total number of committed persons enrolled 17        in the Department's hospice and palliative care 18        programs; 19            (B) the total number of admissions into and 20        discharges from the Department's hospice and 21        palliative care programs, including the number of 22        committed persons who died while in the program and 23        the number of committed persons who were removed from 24        the program for other reasons; and 25            (C) the number of committed persons denied entry 26        into the Department's hospice and palliative care   HB4665 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17713 RLC 31144 b1        programs, including any reasons that they were denied; 2        (3) data on the timing of hospice and palliative care 3    programming, including the following: 4            (A) the average length of time that committed 5        persons receive hospice and palliative care; and 6            (B) the average length of time between the 7        diagnosis of a terminal condition and admission into a 8        hospice and palliative care program; 9        (4) the number of committed persons in the custody of 10    the Department who died, separated by the following 11    categories: 12            (A) committed persons who died while receiving 13        hospice and palliative care; and14            (B) committed persons who died without receiving 15        hospice and palliative care, and the number of such 16        committed persons who died as a result of natural, 17        accidental, suicidal, or homicidal causes; 18        (5) policies and administrative directives of each 19    Department institution and facility regarding the 20    institution of hospice and palliative care. This data 21    shall include the following information: 22            (A) the name of each institution and facility that 23        offers hospice and palliative care services; 24            (B) criteria to be eligible for hospice and 25        palliative care services, both Department-wide and at 26        each institution and facility;   HB4665 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17713 RLC 31144 b1            (C) a list of the types of hospice and palliative 2        care services that are offered in each institution and 3        facility. This list shall include, but is not limited 4        to, pain management, psychological counseling, peer 5        support, and chaplain services. If available, this 6        list shall also include supportive services offered to 7        family members of committed persons; 8            (D) the accreditation status of the Department's 9        hospice and palliative care programs, if available; 10            (E) the procedures for committed persons in the 11        Department's custody to request an advance directive 12        for health care in each institution and facility; 13            (F) the procedures for health care or legal staff 14        to assist committed persons in completing advance 15        directive instruments; and 16            (G) the procedures for health care providers to 17        implement advance directives for health care in each 18        institution and facility; 19        (6) the staff available for hospice and palliative 20    care. This data shall include the following: 21            (A) the number of specialized staff at each 22        institution and facility, including palliative care 23        physicians, nurses, and social workers; 24            (B) the number of volunteers dedicated to hospice 25        and palliative care, separated by the following 26        categories:   HB4665 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17713 RLC 31144 b1                (i) volunteers who are committed persons of 2            the Department; 3                (ii) volunteers who are not committed persons 4            of the Department; and 5                (iii) the ratio between the number of staff 6            and the number of patients in the Department's 7            hospice and palliative care programs; and 8        (7) the cost of the Department's hospice and 9    palliative care programs, including the following: 10            (A) the annual costs associated with hospice and 11        palliative care across the Department; 12            (B) the sources of funding for hospice and 13        palliative care services; and14            (C) the annual costs associated with hospice and 15        palliative care at each Department institution and 16        facility; and . 17        (8) the cost of the Department's end-of-life care for 18    committed persons who died of natural causes and were not 19    in hospice or palliative care programs. 20    All such data shall be anonymized to protect the privacy 21of the committed persons involved in the hospice and 22palliative care programs. 23(Source: P.A. 104-220, eff. 1-1-26.)